Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
323

HOSPITALS
AND MEDICAL FACILITIES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

323-1 Contracts with territories and possessions
of

the United States

323-2 Hospital visitation policy and extension
of

authority to reciprocal beneficiaries

323-3 Practice by advanced practice registered
nurses

Part II. Hospitals and Medical Facilities
Survey

and Construction--Repealed

323-11 to 25 Repealed

Part III. Planning for Health Care Facilities
and

Services--Repealed

323-31 to 46 Repealed

Part IV. Therapy

323-51 Animal therapy

Part V. Division of Community Hospitals

Administration--Repealed

323-61 to 75 Repealed

Note

Family practice ambulatory health center. L 1993, c 347, §4.

Cross References

Dental health facilities; health care facilities; use of
latex gloves, see §321-11.9.

Hospital acquisitions, see §§323D-71 to 83.

Hospital sustainability program, see chapter 346G.

Kahuku medical center; designation as a rural hospital,
see §346-53.8.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next